Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-781
Coverage for treatment of alcoholism; benefits available.

An insurance company or health maintenance organization which does not provide basic coverage for treatment of alcoholism may nevertheless provide different or lesser benefits. Nothing in sections 44-769 to 44-781 is intended to limit any insurance company or health maintenance organization from providing more coverage for the treatment of alcoholism than is described in section 44-778.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 13;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 161.